lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
LEXICON Casekevesl
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz  #;    ! esz, el/ol nagylasz
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo2§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok nagylotok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^i      #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae2§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§ae2§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae2§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§ae2§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§oe2§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON CaseInfkevesl
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;


LEXICON AddVerb55
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case55;

LEXICON Case55
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§ék     #; !omoljék


!ismer
LEXICON AddVerbszik
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Caseszik;

LEXICON Caseszik
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^szik      #;    ! ismerszik


LEXICON AddVerboeetott
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeetott;

LEXICON Repoeetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoeetott;
                    Imper1oeetott;

LEXICON Imperoeetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoeetott;
                      Nrepoeet2ott;
LEXICON Imper1oeetott
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoeetott;
                      Nrep1oeetott;

LEXICON Nrepoeetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeetott;
                      NImperoeet2ott;
LEXICON Nrepoeet2ott
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeetott;
                      NImperoeet2ott;

LEXICON Nrep1oeetott
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImperoeetott;
                      NImper1oeetott;

LEXICON NImperoeetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeetott;
                      Potoeet2ott;
LEXICON NImperoeet2ott
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeetott;
                      Potoeet2ott;

LEXICON NImper1oeetott
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Potoeetott;
                      Pot1oeetott;

LEXICON Potoeetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfetott;
             Caseoe;
LEXICON Potoeet2ott
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfetott;
             Caseoe;

LEXICON Pot1oeetott
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfetott;
             Case1oeott; ! case1 if differs

LEXICON AddInfetott
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
     Caseoe;

LEXICON Verb
botol AddVerb55;
bugyborékol AddVerb55;
bukdácsol AddVerb55;
bóbiskol AddVerb55;
csillámol AddVerb55;
csűr AddVerboeetott;
curikkol AddVerb55;
curukkol AddVerb55;
dacol AddVerb55;
főz AddVerboeetott;
fűl AddVerboeetott;
fűz AddVerboeetott;
győz AddVerboeetott;
gyűr AddVerboeetott;
ismer AddVerbszik;
nyivákol AddVerb55;
szűr AddVerboeetott;
tiktakol AddVerb55;
tör AddVerboeetott;
tűr AddVerboeetott;
tűz AddVerboeetott;
viharoz AddVerb55;
villámol AddVerb55;
űz AddVerboeetott;
LEXICON Verb1
lejjebbcsűr AddVerboeetott; !ige
